North Carolina statutes. Chapter 147. State Officers.
Article 5A. Auditor.
§ 147-64.11.
Review of office.

The Auditor may, on the Auditor’s own initiative and as often as the Auditor deems necessary, or as requested by the General Assembly or the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General Government, cause to be made a quality review audit of the operations of the Auditor’s office. Such a “peer review” shall be conducted in accordance with standards prescribed by the accounting profession. Upon the recommendation of the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Auditor may contract with an independent public accountant, qualified management consultant, or other professional person to conduct a financial and compliance, economy and efficiency, and program result audit of the State Auditor.

History.

1983, c. 913, s. 2; 2006-203, s. 117; 2021-180, s. 37.4.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 37.13, made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 37.4, effective November 18, 2021, and applicable to reports submitted on or after that date.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-203, s. 117, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to the budget for the 2007-2009 biennium and each subsequent biennium thereafter, deleted “the Advisory Budget Commission,” following “recommendation of” in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 37.4, in the introductory paragraph, substituted “the Auditor’s” for “his” three times in the first sentence; substituted “Operations, the Auditor” for “Operations” in the third sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 147-64.12.
Conflict of interest.

To preserve the independence and objectivity of the audit function, the Auditor and his employees may not, unless otherwise expressly authorized by statute, serve in any capacity on an administrative board, commission, or agency of government of a political subdivision of the State or any other organization that, under the provisions of this act, they have the responsibility or authority to audit. Nor shall they have a material, direct or indirect financial, or other economic interest in the transactions of any State agency.

The Auditor shall not conduct an audit on a program or activity for which he had management responsibility or in which he has been employed during the preceding two years. The General Assembly shall otherwise provide for the necessary audit of programs and activities within the meaning of this subsection.If the Auditor’s hotline receives a report of allegations of improper governmental activities in a program or activity that the Auditor is prohibited by this subsection from auditing, the Hotline Manager shall transmit the report to the Legislative Services Officer or his designee. The report shall retain the same confidentiality after transmittal to the General Assembly that it had in the possession of the Auditor.

History.

1983, c. 913, s. 2; 1993, c. 152, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 8(n).

§ 147-64.13.
Construction.

This Article shall be construed liberally in the aid of its declared purpose. It is the intent of this Article that the establishment of the Office of the Auditor and the duties, powers, qualifications, and purposes herein specified shall take precedence over any conflicting part or application of any other law.

History.

1983, c. 913, s. 2.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Pursuant to this section, the provisions of G.S. 147-64.7(a)(1) supersede the provisions of

G.S. 126-24

to the extent they conflict.

Specifically, the Auditor’s power to examine documents in the course of an authorized audit includes the power to examine confidential employee personnel files relevant to that audit without the consent of the employee or his employer.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Ralph Campbell, Jr., State Auditor, 1999 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 8 (3/5/99).

§ 147-64.14.
Severability.

If any provision of this Article or the application thereof to any person, State agency, political subdivision, or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidation shall not affect other provisions or applications of this Article which can be given effect without the invalid provision of application, and to this end the provisions of this Article are declared severable.

History.

1983, c. 913, s. 2.